Oklahoma, session 2026, SB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-501 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Perfluoroalkyl and Polyfluoroalkyl Substances (PFAS) Act”.


B. As used in the Oklahoma Perfluoroalkyl and Polyfluoroalkyl


Substances (PFAS) Act:


1. “AFFF” means aqueous film-forming foam containing


intentionally added PFAS;

Req. No. 927 Page 1


2. “AFFF waste” means AFFF, diluted AFFF, and water or soil


contaminated with AFFF containing intentionally added PFAS with a


concentration greater than one part per billion, which is abandoned,


discarded, disposed, destroyed, or stored pending disposal or


destruction; and


3. “PFAS” means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-502 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Subject to subsection B of this section, the following


protected passive receivers of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl


substances (PFAS) that provide essential services shall not be


civilly liable to this state for costs arising from a release of


PFAS to the environment:


1. A public water system, as defined in Section 1401 of the


federal Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C., Section 300f;


2. A publicly or privately owned or operated treatment works,


as defined in Section 212 of the Federal Water Pollution Control


Act, 33 U.S.C., Section 1292, or the owner of a site where biosolids


generated from a treatment works or a permitted municipal wastewater


lagoon, as defined by the administrative rules of the Department of


Environmental Quality, are applied;





Req. No. 927 Page 2


3. A municipality to which a permit is issued for stormwater


discharges under Section 402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control


Act, 33 U.S.C., Section 1342;


4. A political subdivision of this state acting as a wholesale


water agency;


5. A contractor performing the management or disposal


activities described in subsection B of this section for an entity


described in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this subsection;


6. An entity with a fire suppression system installed or


otherwise in use, in accordance with applicable federal, state, and


local fire codes, that uses aqueous film-forming foam (AFFF)


containing PFAS;


7. A sponsor of the civilian portion of a joint-use airport or


a shared-use airport which releases PFAS as a result of the use of


AFFF pursuant to, and carried out in accordance with, Federal


Aviation Administration standards and guidance on the use of the


substances; and


8. An owner or operator of a solid waste management facility,


as defined in Section 1004 of the Solid Waste Disposal Act, 42


U.S.C., Section 6903, to the extent that the facility received


routine municipal solid waste, including commercial solid waste


containing incidental amounts of PFAS.


B. The exemption from liability contained in subsection A of


this section shall not apply if the release of PFAS resulted from a

Req. No. 927 Page 3


material violation of relevant and applicable federal, state, or


other legal requirements or standards related to the management,


storage, transport, conveyance, treatment, discharge, and disposal


of PFAS, or of commonly accepted engineering standards in existence


at the time that the activity is carried out.


C. Nothing in this section shall preclude liability for damages


or costs associated with the release of PFAS by a protected passive


receiver of PFAS if the protected passive receiver acts with gross


negligence or willful misconduct in the discharge, disposal,


management, conveyance, or storage of PFAS.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-503 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. The Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate rules


related to the receipt, storage, treatment, and disposal of


perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) in this state,


including rules related to a waste exclusion plan.


2. Rules promulgated under subsection A of this section shall


require that any person accepting aqueous film-forming foam (AFFF)


waste for storage, treatment, or disposal prove to the Department


that the manner of such storage, treatment, or disposal is


protective of human health and the environment. The Department


shall establish criteria and guidelines for determinations under


this subsection.

Req. No. 927 Page 4


B. 1. The Board shall establish a schedule of fees, pursuant


to Section 2-3-402 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes and the


Administrative Procedures Act, for the application to dispose, and


for disposal of, AFFF waste at a facility in this state.


2. Any fees established pursuant to this subsection shall be in


lieu of any tonnage fees assessed to the holder of a permit by the


Department for solid or hazardous waste disposal. The fees shall be


deposited into the Department of Environmental Quality Revolving


Fund.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-504 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person or entity seeking to receive, store, treat, or


dispose of more than two hundred (200) pounds of aqueous film-


forming foam (AFFF) waste per day shall submit an application to the


Department of Environmental Quality and receive authorization for


such action. The Department, in the exercise of its reasonable


discretion, may waive specific requirements of this act or rules


where there is no feasible alternative to the storage, treatment, or


disposal at issue and the action does not result in a greater risk


to human health and the environment. Prior to the promulgation of


rules in Section 3 of this act, the Department may authorize the


continuation of activities under this subsection if it determines



Req. No. 927 Page 5


that the activities will be conducted in a manner that is


sufficiently protective of human health and the environment.


B. Nothing in this section shall relieve the manufacturer of


perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) containing


material from liability related to the storage, treatment, or


disposal of PFAS waste.


C. 1. AFFF waste generated in or transported from another


state shall maintain the same classification or characterization it


would receive in the state of origin, unless such classification or


characterization is less protective of human health and the


environment than the classification or characterization it would


have received if generated in this state.


2. If AFFF waste generated in or transported from another state


is banned from disposal in the state of origin, then the waste is


similarly banned from disposal in Oklahoma, unless the AFFF waste is


effectively banned from disposal in the state of origin due to a


lack of permitted hazardous waste landfills within the state. If


the AFFF waste is effectively banned from disposal in the state of


origin due to a lack of permitted hazardous waste landfills within


the state, then the AFFF waste may be disposed of in landfills


permitted under the Oklahoma Hazardous Waste Management Act pursuant


to Section 2-7-101 et seq. of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 927 Page 6


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-927 RD 12/30/2024 8:30:15 PM









































Req. No. 927 Page 7